Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 5 Permanent Guardianship

29-2-14.
Power of probate court to appoint guardian.

The probate court of the county in which a minor is found or in which the proposed permanent guardian is domiciled shall have the power to appoint a permanent guardian for a minor who has no natural guardian, testamentary guardian, or permanent guardian. In its discretion, the probate court of the county in which the petition for appointment of a permanent guardian is filed may transfer the case to the probate court of any other county in this state if such transfer would serve the best interest of the minor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Cross references.

Jurisdiction of courts to appoint guardian of child, §

15-11-6

.

Appointment of guardian ad litem in probate proceedings, § 53-3-19 (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Provision that surviving spouse under 18 years may take share of estate without intervention of guardian, § 53-4-2(3) (Pre-1998 Probate Code).

Law reviews.

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to the welfare of minors, see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 189 (1969).

For article, “Trusts for Dependents: Effect of Georgia’s Support Obligation on Federal Income Taxation,” see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 323 (1972).

For article, “Wills, Trusts & Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).

29-2-15.
“Biological father” defined; notice of petition for appointment of permanent guardian; protest of father; petition to legitimate.

For purposes of this part, the term “biological father” means a father of a minor born out of wedlock whose rights regarding the minor have not been surrendered or terminated but who is not entitled to have custody of and exercise parental power over the child pursuant to Code Section 19-7-25.

Notice of a petition for appointment of a permanent guardian of a minor shall be given to the minor’s biological father, if any, in the following circumstances:

If the identity of the biological father is known to the petitioner;

If the biological father is a registrant on the putative father registry who has acknowledged paternity of the minor in accordance with subparagraph (d)(2)(A) of Code Section 19-11-9;

If the biological father is a registrant on the putative father registry who has indicated possible paternity of a child of the minor’s mother during a period beginning two years immediately prior to the minor’s date of birth in accordance with subparagraph (d)(2)(B) of Code Section 19-11-9; or

If the biological father has lived with the minor; contributed to the minor’s support; made any attempt to legitimate the minor; or provided support or medical care for the mother either during her pregnancy or during her hospitalization for the birth of the minor.

The notice shall advise the biological father that he will lose all rights to object to the appointment of a permanent guardian for the minor if he does not file an objection with the court within 14 days of the notice and file a petition to legitimate the minor within 30 days of the hearing on his objection. The notice shall include the name of the individual who will be the minor’s permanent guardian if the petition is granted.

If the biological father files a timely objection to the petition, the court shall hear the objection and, if the biological father makes a request, shall continue the hearing for 30 days to allow the father to file a petition to legitimate the minor pursuant to Code Section 19-7-22. If the biological father’s petition for legitimation of the minor is granted, the petition for the appointment of a permanent guardian for the minor shall be dismissed.

If the biological father does not file a petition for legitimation within 30 days or files a petition that is subsequently dismissed for failure to prosecute or files a petition and the action is subsequently concluded without a court order declaring that he is the father of the minor, the biological father shall have no further rights to receive notice of or object to the appointment of a permanent guardian for the minor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 403 (2005).

29-2-16.
Individuals with preference for permanent guardianship of minor; preference not controlling.

The court shall appoint as permanent guardian that individual who will serve the best interest of the minor, considering the following order of preferences:

The adult who is the preference of the minor if the minor is 14 years of age or older;

The nearest adult relative of the minor determined according to Code Section 53-2-1;

Other adult relatives of the minor;

Other adults who are related to the minor by marriage;

An adult who was designated in writing by either of the minor’s natural guardians in a notarized document or document witnessed by two or more persons; or

An adult who has provided care or support for the minor or with whom the minor has lived.

The court may disregard an individual who has preference and appoint an individual who has a lower preference or no preference. In determining what is in the best interest of the minor, the court may take into account any facts and circumstances presented to it, including the statement of a minor who is under 14 years of age.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

Cross references.

Grandparent defined, §

19-7-3

.

County administrators as ex officio county guardians, §

29-3-1

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Wills, Trusts & Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).

29-2-17.
Petition for appointment of permanent guardian; requirements of petition; notice.

Any interested person may file a petition for the appointment of a permanent guardian of a minor.

The petition for appointment of a permanent guardian shall set forth:

A statement of the facts upon which the court’s jurisdiction is based;

The name, address, and date of birth of the minor;

The name, address, and county of domicile of the petitioner and the petitioner’s relationship to the minor, if any, and, if different from the petitioner, the name, address, and county of domicile of the individual nominated by the petitioner to serve as guardian and that individual’s relationship to the minor, if any;

A statement that the minor has no natural guardian, testamentary guardian, or permanent guardian;

A statement of whether the child was born out of wedlock and, if so, the name and address of the biological father, if known;

Whether, to the petitioner’s knowledge, there exists any notarized or witnessed document made by a parent of the minor that deals with the guardianship of the minor and the name and address of any designee named in the document;

In addition to the petitioner and the nominated guardian, the names and addresses of the following relatives of the minor whose whereabouts are known:

The adult siblings of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three adult siblings need to be listed;

If there is no adult sibling of the minor, the grandparents of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three grandparents need to be listed; or

If there is no grandparent of the minor, any three of the nearest adult relatives of the minor determined according to Code Section 53-2-1;

Whether a temporary guardian has been appointed for the minor or a petition for the appointment of a temporary guardian has been filed or is being filed; and

The reason for any omission in the petition for appointment of a permanent guardian for a minor in the event full particulars are lacking.

In addition to the notice required by Code Section 29-2-15, notice of the petition for appointment of a permanent guardian for a minor shall be given to any designee named in paragraph (6) of subsection (b) of this Code section and the individuals named in paragraph (7) of subsection (b) of this Code section. The notice shall be by personal service if the individual resides in this state at a known address; by first-class mail if the individual resides outside this state at a known address; or by publication for two weeks in the official county legal organ for the county in which the petition is filed if no address is known. The notice shall state that the individual is entitled to object either to the establishment of a permanent guardianship or to the selection of the petitioner as permanent guardian, or both. The notice shall require that any objection be filed in writing with the court within ten days of the personal service, within 14 days of the mailing of the notice, or within ten days of the date of the second publication of the notice.

If the judge deems it necessary, a temporary guardian may be appointed under the same rules that apply to the appointment of a temporary administrator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

29-2-18.
Hearing; best interest of the child standard.

Upon the filing of a petition for the appointment of a permanent guardian of a minor and the giving of notice, the court shall hold a hearing and the standard for determination for all matters at issue shall be the best interest of the minor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-2-19.
Requirements of order granting permanent guardianship.

An order granting permanent guardianship shall specify:

The name of the permanent guardian and the basis for the selection of the guardian;

A specific listing of any of the additional powers which are granted to the permanent guardian as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 29-2-22;

If only a guardian is appointed or if the guardian and the conservator appointed are not the same person, the reasonable sums of property to be provided the guardian to provide adequately for the minor’s support, care, education, health, and welfare are subject to modification by subsequent order of the court; and

Such other and further provisions of the guardianship as the court shall determine to be in the best interest of the minor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.